West Virginia, session 2026, SB1079.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. PAYMENT AND DEPOSIT OF TAXES AND OTHER AMOUNTS DUE THE STATE OR ANY POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. §12-2-1. How and to whom taxes and other amounts due the state or any political subdivision, official, department, board, commission or other collecting agency thereof may be paid. (a) All persons, firms and corporations shall promptly pay all taxes and other amounts due from them to the state, or to any political subdivision, official, department, board, commission or other collecting agency thereof authorized by law to collect the taxes and other amounts due by any authorized commercially acceptable means, in money, United States currency or by check, bank draft, certified check, cashier's check, post office money order, express money order or electronic funds transfer payable and delivered to the official, department, board, commission or collecting agency thereof authorized by law to collect the taxes and other amounts due and having the account upon which the taxes or amounts due are chargeable against the payer of the taxes or amounts due. The duly elected or appointed officers of the state and of its political subdivisions, departments, boards, commissions and collecting agencies having the account on which the taxes or other amounts due are chargeable against the payer of the taxes or other amounts due and authorized by law to collect the taxes or other amounts due, and their respective agents, deputies, assistants and employees shall in no case be the agent of the payer in and about the collection of the taxes or other amounts, but shall at all times and under all circumstances be the agent of the state, its political subdivision, official, department, board, commission or collecting agency having the account on which the taxes or amounts are chargeable against the payer of the taxes or other amounts due and authorized by law to collect the same.(b) The Public Employees Insurance Agency shall accept premium payments from political subdivisions by any authorized commercially acceptable means, in money, United States currency or by check, bank draft, certified check, cashier's check, post office money order, express money order, credit card, or electronic funds transfer. ARTICLE 3. APPROPRIATIONS, EXPENDITURES AND DEDUCTIONS. §12-3-10a. Purchasing Card Program. Notwithstanding the provisions of section ten of this article, payment of claims may be made through the use of the state Purchasing Card Program authorized by the provisions of this section. The Auditor, in cooperation with the Secretary of the Department of Administration, may establish a state Purchasing Card Program for the purpose of authorizing all spending units of state government to use a purchasing card as an alternative payment method. The Purchasing Card Program shall be conducted so that procedures and controls for the procurement and payment of goods and services are made more efficient. The program shall permit spending units to use a purchasing card to pay for goods and services, including premium payments to the Public Employees Insurance Agency.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, a purchasing card may be used to make any payment authorized by the Auditor, including regular routine payments and travel and emergency payments, and such payments shall be set at an amount to be determined by the Auditor. Purchasing cards may not be utilized for the purpose of obtaining cash advances, whether the advances are made in cash or by other negotiable instrument: Provided, That purchasing cards may be used for cash advances for travel purchases upon approval of the Auditor. Purchases of goods and services must be received either in advance of or simultaneously with the use of a state purchasing card for payment for those goods or services. The Auditor, by legislative rule, may eliminate the requirement for vendor invoices and provide a procedure for consolidating multiple vendor payments into one monthly payment to a charge card vendor. Selection of a charge card vendor to provide state purchase cards shall be accomplished by competitive bid. The Purchasing Division of the Department of Administration shall contract with the successful bidder for provision of state purchasing cards. Purchasing cards issued under the program shall be used for official state purchases only. The Auditor shall propose rules for promulgation in accordance with the provisions of article three, chapter twenty-nine-a of this code to govern the implementation of the purchase card program.